Connecticut, session 2026, SB00507.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. Subsection (a) of section 18-81jj of the 2026 supplement to
the general statutes is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu
thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
(a) There is established the Correction Advisory Committee that shall
consist of eleven members [. Such members] who shall be appointed as
follows:
(1) One who is directly impacted, appointed by the Senate
chairperson of the joint standing committee of the General Assembly
having cognizance of matters relating to the Department of Correction;
(2) One who has expertise in law, specifically the rights of
incarcerated persons, appointed by the House chairperson of the joint
standing committee of the General Assembly having cognizance of
matters relating to the Department of Correction;
SB507 / File No. 509 1

SB507 File No. 509
(3) One who has a demonstrated interest in advancing the rights and
welfare of incarcerated persons, appointed by the president pro tempore
of the Senate;
(4) One who has a demonstrated interest in advancing the rights and
welfare of incarcerated persons, appointed by the speaker of the House
of Representatives;
(5) One who has expertise in the provision of mental health care to
incarcerated persons or formerly incarcerated persons, appointed by the
minority leader of the Senate;
(6) One who has expertise in the provision of medical care to
incarcerated persons or formerly incarcerated persons, appointed by the
minority leader of the House of Representatives;
(7) One [of whom] who is a victim of a violent crime, a person who
advocates for victims' rights or an attorney who has represented a victim
of a violent crime, appointed by the House ranking member of the joint
standing committee of the General Assembly having cognizance of
matters relating to the Department of Correction;
(8) One who has an expertise in corrections, appointed by the Senate
ranking member of the joint standing committee of the General
Assembly having cognizance of matters relating to the Department of
Correction; and
(9) Three who are appointed by the Governor, one of whom has
expertise in corrections, one of whom has expertise in medication in a
correctional setting and one of whom is directly impacted.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 October 1, 2026 18-81jj(a)
JUD Joint Favorable
SB507 / File No. 509 2

SB507 File No. 509
The following Fiscal Impact Statement and Bill Analysis are prepared for the benefit of the members of
the General Assembly, solely for purposes of information, summarization and explanation and do not
represent the intent of the General Assembly or either chamber thereof for any purpose. In general,
fiscal impacts are based upon a variety of informational sources, including the analyst’s professional
knowledge. Whenever applicable, agency data is consulted as part of the analysis, however final
products do not necessarily reflect an assessment from any specific department.
OFA Fiscal Note
State Impact: None
Municipal Impact: None
Explanation
The bill makes technical changes and results in no fiscal impact.
The Out Years
State Impact: None
Municipal Impact: None
SB507 / File No. 509 3

SB507 File No. 509
OLR Bill Analysis
SB 507
AN ACT CONCERNING THE CORRECTION ADVISORY
COMMITTEE.